Mississippi, session 2026, SB2422.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 33-11-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 33-11-1.  The Adjutant General of this state may make on behalf of the state, conveyances of real property that are in the best interest of the Mississippi Military Department. Such real property may be conveyed to a subdivision of government or state agency, institution, public university or community or junior college, for any consideration and upon such other terms and conditions as the Adjutant General may deem advisable.  The Adjutant General is further empowered to enter into cooperative agreements with any county, municipality, or other political subdivision, of the state for providing facilities for National Guard training purposes.  The Adjutant General is further empowered to enter into cooperative agreements with any county, municipality or other political subdivision for the conveyance of real property to the county, municipality or subdivision for the exclusive use of a nonprofit entity that is in the best interest of the Mississippi Military Department or the best interest of veterans. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.